Utah statutes.
73-30-202.   Duties of the council.

(1) (a)  The council shall advise the persons listed in Subsection (1)(b) on the sustainable use, protection, and development of the Great Salt Lake in terms of balancing:

(i)  sustainable use;

(ii)  environmental health; and

(iii)  reasonable access for existing and future development.

(b)  The council shall advise, as provided in Subsection (1)(a):

(i)  the governor;

(ii)  the Department of Natural Resources; and

(iii)  the Department of Environmental Quality.

(2)  The council shall assist the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands in its responsibilities for the Great Salt Lake described in Section 65A-10-8.

(3)  The council:

(a)  may recommend appointments to the Great Salt Lake technical team created by the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands; and

(b)  shall receive and utilize technical support from the Great Salt Lake technical team.

(4)  The council shall assist the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Environmental Quality, and their applicable boards in accomplishing their responsibilities for the Great Salt Lake.

(5)  The council shall report annually to the Natural Resources Appropriations Subcommittee on the council's activities.

